Utah statutes.
31A-37a-204.   Prior approval of a change in plan of operation and other
transactions.
(1)  A special purpose financial captive insurance company may not change its
plan of operation without the prior approval of the commissioner.
(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b), a special purpose financial captive
insurance company may not engage in a transaction or series of transactions
without the prior approval of the commissioner if the transaction or series of
transactions:
(i)  is undertaken to dissolve the special purpose financial captive insurance
company; or
(ii)  results in the termination of all or a part of a special purpose
financial captive insurance company's business.
(b)  A special purpose financial captive insurance company is not required to
obtain the prior approval of the commissioner for a transaction or series of
transactions described in Subsection (2)(a)(ii) if:
(i)  the transaction or series of transactions is done in accordance with a
document or agreement described in the special purpose financial captive
insurance company's plan of operation; and
(ii)  the special purpose financial captive insurance company notifies the
commissioner prior to the transaction or series of transactions.
(3)  A special purpose financial captive insurance company shall notify the
commissioner before a change in the legal ownership of a security issued by
the special purpose financial captive insurance company.
